Massachusetts, session 194th, H653.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Subsection (i)(3) of section 89 of chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby
amended in the second sentence of the first paragraph thereof by striking the words “shall only
approve” and inserting in place thereof the words:- may give priority to.
Section 2. Said subsection (i)(3) of section 89 of chapter 71 is hereby further amended in
the last sentence of the first paragraph thereof by striking the word “shall” and inserting in place
thereof the following word:- may.
of 1